Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7010
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act:

(1) Biodiesel means mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats which conform to American Society for Testing and Materials D6751 specifications for use in diesel engines. Biodiesel refers to the pure fuel with less than one percent blended with diesel fuel;

(2) Department means the Department of Revenue;

(3) Motor fuel pump means a meter or similar commercial weighing and measuring device used to measure and dispense motor fuel originating from a motor fuel storage tank;

(4) Retail dealer means a person engaged in the business of storing and dispensing motor fuel from a motor fuel pump for sale on a retail basis;

(5) Retail motor fuel site means a geographic location in this state where a retail dealer sells and dispenses motor fuel from a motor fuel pump on a retail basis, including a permanent or mobile location; and

(6) Taxpayer means any natural person or any limited liability company, partnership, private domestic or private foreign corporation, or domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation certified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 2.